Hawaii statutes.
PART II. [INSPECTION
OF VEHICLES AND MOPEDS]

§286-21 Vehicles and mopeds without
required equipment or in unsafe condition. [Section effective January
1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see main volume.] No
person shall drive or cause to move on any highway any motor vehicle, moped,
trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, or any combination thereof, unless the
equipment thereon is in good working order and adjustment as required in this
part and does not endanger the driver or other occupant or any person upon the
highway. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-21; am L 2016, c 200, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next